Utah statutes.
13-15-4.   Information to be filed by seller -- Representations.
(1)  Any seller of an assisted marketing plan shall file the following
information with the division:
(a)  the name, address, and principal place of business of the seller, and the
name, address, and principal place of business of the parent or holding
company of the seller, if any, who is responsible for statements made by the
seller;
(b)  all trademarks, trade names, service marks, or advertising or other
commercial symbols  that identify the products, equipment, supplies, or
services to be offered, sold, or distributed by the prospective purchaser;
(c)  an individual detailed statement covering the past five years of the
business experience of each of the seller's current directors and executive
officers and an individual statement covering the same period for the seller
and the seller's parent company, if any, including the length of time each:
(i)  has conducted a business of the type advertised or solicited for
operation by a prospective purchaser;
(ii)  has offered or sold the assisted marketing plan; and
(iii)  has offered for sale or sold assisted marketing plans in other lines of
business, together with a description of the other lines of business;
(d)  a statement of the total amount that shall be paid by the purchaser to
obtain or commence the business opportunity such as initial fees, deposits,
down payments, prepaid rent, and equipment and inventory purchases; provided,
that if all or part of these fees or deposits are returnable, the conditions
under which they are returnable shall also be disclosed;
(e)  a complete statement of the actual services the seller will perform for
the purchaser;
(f)  a complete statement of all oral, written, or visual representations that
will be made to prospective purchasers about specific levels of potential
sales, income, gross and net profits, or any other representations that
suggest a specific level;
(g)  a complete description of the type and length of any training promised to
prospective purchasers;
(h)  a complete description of any services promised to be performed by the
seller in connection with the placement of the equipment, products, or
supplies at any location from which they will be sold or used; and a complete
description of those services together with any agreements that will be made
by the seller with the owner or manager of the location where the purchaser's
equipment, products, or supplies will be placed;
(i)  a statement that discloses any person identified in Subsection (1)(a)
who:
(i)  has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor or pleaded nolo contendere
to a felony or misdemeanor charge if the felony or misdemeanor involved fraud,
embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property;
(ii)  has been held liable or consented to the entry of a stipulated judgment
in any civil action based upon fraud, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion,
misappropriation of property, or the use of untrue or misleading
representations in the sale or attempted sale of any real or personal
property, or upon the use of any unfair, unlawful or deceptive business
practice; or
(iii)  is subject to an injunction or restrictive order relating to business
activity as the result of an action brought by a public agency;
(j)  a financial statement of the seller signed by one of the seller's
officers, directors, trustees, or general or limited partners, under a
declaration that certifies that to the signatory's knowledge and belief the
information in the financial statement is true and accurate; a financial
statement that is more than 13 months old is unacceptable;
(k)  a copy of the entire marketing plan contract;
(l)  the number of marketing plans sold to date, and the number of plans under
negotiation;
(m)  geographical information including all states in which the seller's
assisted marketing  plans have been sold, and the number of plans in each such
state;
(n)  the total number of marketing plans that were cancelled by the seller in
the past 12 months; and
(o)  the number of marketing plans that were voluntarily terminated by
purchasers within the past 12 months and the total number of such voluntary
terminations to date.
(2)  The seller of an assisted marketing plan filing information under
Subsection (1) shall pay a fee as determined by the department in accordance
with Section 63J-1-504.
(3)  Before commencing business in this state, the seller of an assisted
marketing plan shall file the information required under Subsection (1) and
receive from the division proof of receipt of the filing.
(4)  A seller of an assisted marketing plan claiming an exemption from filing
under this chapter shall file a notice of claim of exemption from filing with
the division.  A seller claiming an exemption from filing bears the burden of
proving the exemption.  The division shall collect a fee for filing a notice
of claim of exemption, as determined by the department in accordance with
Section 63J-1-504.
(5)  A representation described in Subsection (1)(f) shall be relevant to the
geographic market in which the business opportunity is to be located.  When
the statements or representations are made, a warning after the representation
in not less than 12 point upper and lower case boldface type shall appear as
follows:
CAUTION
No guarantee of earnings or ranges of earnings can be made. The number of
purchasers who have earned through this business an amount in excess of the
amount of their initial payment is at least _____ which represents _____% of
the total number of purchasers of this business opportunity.
